New York, session 2025-2026, A1214.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general obligations law is amended by adding a new 2 section 5-338 to read as follows: 3 § 5-338. Conditions and preconditions of employment. 1. As used in 4 this section the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Employer" means any person, either individual, corporation, part- 6 nership, agency, or firm, that employs an employee and includes any 7 person, either individual, corporation, partnership, agency, or firm, 8 acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation 9 to an employee; and 10 (b) "Employee" means any person employed by or suffered or permitted 11 to work for an employer, who is neither an officer nor employed pursuant 12 to an individualized, mutually-negotiated employment contract. 13 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no employer 14 shall require as a condition or precondition of employment that any 15 employee or person seeking employment waive or otherwise diminish any 16 existing or future claim, right, or benefit to which the employee or 17 person seeking employment would otherwise be entitled under any 18 provision of any New York state or federal statute. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01725-02-6 A. 1214--A 2 1 3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to contracts or 2 agreements negotiated with any labor union through collective bargain- 3 ing. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 5 have become a law.